California, session 20252026, AB636.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14132.33 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14132.33. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, diapers are a covered Medi-Cal benefit for any child greater than three years of age who has been diagnosed with a physical, mental, neurological, or behavioral health condition that contributes to incontinence.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, diapers are a covered Medi-Cal benefit for individuals under 21 years of age if necessary to correct or ameliorate a condition pursuant to the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment (EPSDT) standards set forth under subdivision (b) of Section 14059.5 and under Section 1905(r) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(r)).(c) Diapers provided pursuant to this section shall be limited to an appropriate supply based on the diagnosed condition and the age of the Medi-Cal beneficiary.(d) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.(e) The department shall update the Medi-Cal provider manual, as applicable, in the course of implementing this section.(e)(f) Implementation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation by the Legislature.